Colorado, session 2026A, SB178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1203, add (1.3)
and (1.5) as follows:
10-16-1203. Definitions.
As used in this part 12, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.3) "BOND" MEANS ANY BOND, NOTE, INTERIM CERTIFICATE,
COMMERCIAL PAPER, CONTRACT, OR OTHER EVIDENCE OF INDEBTEDNESS OF
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

THE ENTERPRISE AUTHORIZED BY THIS PART 12.
(1.5) "BOND OBLIGATIONS" MEANS THE DEBT SERVICE ON, AND
RELATED COSTS AND OBLIGATIONS IN CONNECTION WITH, BONDS,
INCLUDING:
(a) PAYMENTS WITH RESPECT TO PRINCIPAL, INTEREST, PREPAYMENT
PREMIUMS, RESERVE FUNDS, SURPLUS FUNDS, SINKING FUNDS, AND COSTS OF
ISSUANCE;
(b) PAYMENTS RELATED TO ANY CREDIT ENHANCEMENT, LIQUIDITY
SUPPORT, OR INTEREST RATE PROTECTION FOR BONDS;
(c) FEES AND EXPENSES OF ANY TRUSTEE, BOND REGISTRAR, PAYING
AGENT, AUTHENTICATING AGENT, REBATE ANALYST OR CONSULTANT,
CALCULATION AGENT, REMARKETING AGENT, OR CREDIT ENHANCEMENT,
LIQUIDITY SUPPORT, OR INTEREST RATE PROTECTION PROVIDER;
(d) COVERAGE REQUIREMENTS; AND
(e) OTHER COSTS, FEES, AND EXPENSES RELATED TO ANY OF THE
OBLIGATIONS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTIONS (1.5)(a) TO (1.5)(d) OF THIS
SECTION AND ANY OTHER AMOUNTS REQUIRED TO BE PAID PURSUANT TO THE
PROVISIONS OF ANY DOCUMENTS AUTHORIZING THE ISSUANCE OF THE
BONDS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1204, amend
(2)(d), (2)(f), and (2)(g); and add (2)(h) as follows:
10-16-1204. Health insurance affordability enterprise - creation
- powers and duties - assess and allocate enterprise fees and
assessments.
(2) The enterprise's primary powers and duties are:
(d) To issue revenue bonds payable from the revenues AND OTHER
AVAILABLE MONEY of the enterprise PLEDGED FOR THEIR PAYMENT AS
AUTHORIZED IN SECTION 10-16-1213;
(f) To engage in outreach and related efforts to increase enrollment
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-178

in health benefit plans across the state; and
(g) To adopt and amend or repeal policies for the regulation of its
affairs and the conduct of its business consistent with this part 12; AND
(h) (I) TO INVEST MONEY IN THE FUND, OTHER THAN PROCEEDS FROM
THE SALE OF BONDS OR EARNINGS ON SUCH PROCEEDS INVESTED PURSUANT
TO SECTION 10-16-1213 (2), WITHOUT REGARD TO THE LIMITATIONS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 24-36-103, 24-75-601.1, OR 24-75-603.
(II) FOR PURPOSES OF INVESTING THE MONEY IN THE FUND, THE
ENTERPRISE MAY ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH PRIVATE PROFESSIONAL
FUND MANAGERS TO PROVIDE EXPERTISE, TECHNICAL SUPPORT, AND ADVICE
ON INVESTMENT MARKET CONDITIONS. IN SEEKING BIDS FOR SUCH
CONTRACTS, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL EMPLOY STANDARD PUBLIC BIDDING
PRACTICES, INCLUDING THE USE OF REQUESTS FOR INFORMATION, REQUESTS
FOR PROPOSALS, OR ANY OTHER STANDARD VENDOR SELECTION PRACTICES
DETERMINED BY THE ENTERPRISE TO BE BEST SUITED FOR SELECTING AN
APPROPRIATE PRIVATE PROFESSIONAL FUND MANAGER.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1205, amend
(2)(d)(I) introductory portion; repeal (2)(e)(III); and add (2)(f) as follows:
10-16-1205. Health insurance affordability fee - special
assessment on hospitals - allocation of revenues.
(2) (d) (I) Except as provided in subsections (2)(d)(IV) and (2)(e) of
this section, the enterprise shall allocate the revenues collected in 2023 and
each year thereafter THROUGH 2026, and any other money deposited in the
fund in 2023 and each year thereafter THROUGH 2026, in the following
amounts and order of priority:
(e) (III) This subsection (2)(e) takes effect on January 1, 2026, only
if the condition specified in section 10-16-1209 (1) occurs.
(f) (I) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ALLOCATE AT LEAST THE FOLLOWING
REVENUES ASSESSED FOR THE 2027 CALENDAR YEAR AND FOR EACH
CALENDAR YEAR THEREAFTER, THE PROCEEDS FROM THE ISSUANCE OF
REVENUE BONDS PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1213, THE MONEY
TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1206 (6), AND
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-178

ANY OTHER MONEY DEPOSITED IN THE FUND FOR ALLOCATION IN THE 2027
CALENDAR YEAR AND IN EACH CALENDAR YEAR THEREAFTER AS FOLLOWS:
(A) FIRST, AT LEAST TWENTY PERCENT FOR SUBSIDIES FOR
STATE-SUBSIDIZED INDIVIDUAL HEALTH COVERAGE PLANS PURCHASED BY
QUALIFIED INDIVIDUALS WHO PAY A PREMIUM FOR SUCH PLANS, AS SPECIFIED
IN RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1215;
(B) SECOND, AT LEAST FIFTY PERCENT TO THE REINSURANCE
PROGRAM CASH FUND;
(C) THIRD, AT LEAST TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT TO REDUCE THE COSTS
OF INDIVIDUAL HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO PURCHASE AN
INDIVIDUAL HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN ON THE EXCHANGE;
(D) FOURTH, UP TO THREE PERCENT FOR ACTUAL ADMINISTRATIVE
COSTS AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1)(b)(IV) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(E) FIFTH, THE ACTUAL COSTS OF ENSURING COMPLIANCE WITH THE
FEDERAL HYDE AMENDMENT OR A SIMILAR AMENDMENT.
(II) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ALLOCATE ANY AMOUNT OF REVENUES
REMAINING AFTER ALLOCATING REVENUES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(2)(f)(I) OF THIS SECTION AND AFTER ANY REDUCTION IN THE AMOUNT OF
BONDS ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1213 (1)(a) RELATED TO THE
ADJUSTMENT IN THE STATEWIDE AVERAGE PREMIUM REDUCTION IN THE
REINSURANCE PROGRAM TO MEET THE FOLLOWING OBJECTIVES:
(A) TO ATTAIN A STATEWIDE AVERAGE PREMIUM REDUCTION IN THE
REINSURANCE PROGRAM OF EIGHTEEN PERCENT, PROVIDE PREMIUM
ASSISTANCE FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO PURCHASE INSURANCE ON THE
EXCHANGE AT THE SAME LEVEL OF PREMIUM ASSISTANCE PROVIDED IN THE
2026 CALENDAR YEAR, AND PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUALS AT THE ENROLLMENT LEVEL ACHIEVED IN THE 2026 CALENDAR
YEAR; AND
(B) TO SUPPORT ADDITIONAL AFFORDABILITY EFFORTS TO MAINTAIN
OR INCREASE COVERAGE IN THE INDIVIDUAL MARKET.
(III) IN ANY CALENDAR YEAR, AFTER MAKING THE ALLOCATIONS
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-178

SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTIONS (2)(f)(I) AND (2)(f)(II) OF THIS SECTION, IF THERE
IS MONEY REMAINING IN THE FUND ON AUGUST 1 OF THAT CALENDAR YEAR,
THE ENTERPRISE MAY REALLOCATE ANY AMOUNT OF THE REVENUES
COLLECTED AND ALLOCATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(f)(I) OR
(2)(f)(II) OF THIS SECTION THAT HAVE NOT BEEN EXPENDED ON OR BEFORE
AUGUST 1 OF THAT CALENDAR YEAR FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(f)(I) OR (2)(f)(II) OF THIS SECTION EXCEPT THE
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(f)(I)(D) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1206, amend
(1)(d) and (2); and add (6) as follows:
10-16-1206. Health insurance affordability cash fund - creation
- repeal.
(1) There is created in the state treasury the health insurance
affordability cash fund. The fund consists of:
(d) The revenue PROCEEDS collected from revenue bonds issued
pursuant to section 10-16-1204 (1)(b)(II) SECTION 10-16-1213 AND ANY
EARNINGS ON THE INVESTMENT OF BOND PROCEEDS INVESTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 10-16-1213 (2);
(2) (a) Money in the fund shall not be transferred to any other fund,
except as provided in section 10-16-1205 (2), and shall not be used for any
purpose other than the purposes specified in this part 12.
(b) BEFORE ALLOCATING ANY MONEY IN THE FUND FOR PROGRAMS
FUNDED BY THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS PART 12, THE ENTERPRISE
SHALL FIRST PAY FOR BOND OBLIGATIONS ON REVENUE BONDS ISSUED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1213.
(6) BY JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FORTY MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE MARIJUANA TAX CASH FUND CREATED
IN SECTION 39-28.8-501 TO THE FUND.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1207, amend
(4.5); and add (4)(c.5)(I.5) as follows:
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-178

10-16-1207. Health insurance affordability board - creation -
membership - powers and duties - subject to open meetings and public
records laws - annual report - commissioner rules.
(4) The board is authorized to:
(c.5) Further recommend, for approval and establishment by the
commissioner by rule, additional parameters for implementing the subsidies
for state-subsidized individual health coverage plans authorized by this part
12, including that the coverage required pursuant to state-subsidized
individual health coverage plans must:
(I.5) PRIORITIZE ENROLLMENT STABILITY AND CUSTOMER
PREDICTABILITY;
(4.5) Prior to making any final recommendation pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section regarding plans, coverage, and the number of
eligible slots, the board shall seek input and recommendations from
individuals directly affected by programs funded by the enterprise and shall
discuss any input and recommendations received at a board meeting held in
accordance with subsection (6) of this section. The board shall TAKE
REASONABLE STEPS TO provide opportunities for individuals to provide
input and recommendations in AT LEAST English and Spanish, INCLUDING
MAKING WRITTEN MATERIALS AND PRESENTATIONS AVAILABLE NOT LATER
THAN SEVEN DAYS AFTER MEETINGS, AND, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE
AND UPON A REQUEST SUBMITTED AT LEAST SEVEN DAYS IN ADVANCE OF
THE TIME FOR PROVIDING INPUT AND RECOMMENDATIONS, IN OTHER
LANGUAGES. THE BOARD SHALL ALSO INDICATE HOW INPUT AND
RECOMMENDATIONS FROM INDIVIDUALS DIRECTLY AFFECTED BY ENTERPRISE
PROGRAMS WERE INCORPORATED INTO ANY FINAL RECOMMENDATIONS MADE
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1211, amend
(1)(b)(I)(F) as follows:
10-16-1211. Performance audit of the enterprise - repeal.
(1) By December 31, 2027, the state auditor shall complete a
performance audit of the enterprise. In conducting the audit, the state
auditor shall:
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-178

(b) Specify, for each year since the creation of the enterprise:
(I) The annual revenue deposited in the fund from:
(F) Any revenue collected from revenue bonds pursuant to section
10-16-1204 (1)(b)(II) SECTION 10-16-1213;
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 10-16-1212,
10-16-1213, 10-16-1214, 10-16-1215, and 10-16-1216 as follows:
10-16-1212. Study concerning optimization of health insurance
affordability programs - repeal.
(1) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL CONDUCT OR CONTRACT WITH A THIRD
PARTY TO CONDUCT A STUDY, TO BE COMPLETED NO LATER THAN JULY 1,
2027, TO:
(a) EVALUATE THE FEASIBILITY OF RESTRUCTURING THE ENTERPRISE
PROGRAMS TO INCREASE AFFORDABILITY AND MAXIMIZE ENROLLMENT,
INCLUDING THE POTENTIAL CREATION OF A BASIC HEALTH PROGRAM
PURSUANT TO SECTION 1331 OF THE FEDERAL ACT, 42 U.S.C. SEC. 18051;
AND
(b) EVALUATE OR EXPLORE ANY OTHER RELATED ISSUES.
(2) WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE STUDY IS COMPLETED, THE
ENTERPRISE SHALL SUBMIT THE RESULTS OF THE STUDY TO THE HEALTH AND
HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEES OF THE SENATE AND THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES.
(3) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028.
10-16-1213. Bonds - investments - bonds eligible for investment
and exempt from taxation.
(1) (a) ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE ENTERPRISE MAY ISSUE
BONDS TO GENERATE PROCEEDS OF UP TO A TOTAL OF ONE HUNDRED
MILLION DOLLARS FOR ANY OF THE BUSINESS PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS
PART 12, INCLUDING TO FUND THE PROGRAMS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART 12;
EXCEPT THAT, IN DETERMINING THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF BONDS TO ISSUE, THE
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-178

ENTERPRISE SHALL TAKE INTO ACCOUNT AND REDUCE THE AMOUNT OF
BONDS ISSUED BASED ON THE SAVINGS REALIZED BY THE ADJUSTMENT IN
THE STATEWIDE AVERAGE PREMIUM REDUCTION UNDER THE REINSURANCE
PROGRAM PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1205 (2)(f)(II)(A). THE BONDS
SHALL BE ISSUED PURSUANT TO RESOLUTION OF THE BOARD AND SHALL BE
PAYABLE SOLELY OUT OF ALL OR A SPECIFIED PORTION OF THE MONEY IN THE
FUND.
(b) BONDS MAY BE EXECUTED AND DELIVERED BY THE ENTERPRISE
AT SUCH TIMES; MAY BE IN SUCH FORM AND DENOMINATIONS AND INCLUDE
SUCH TERMS AND MATURITIES; MAY BE SUBJECT TO OPTIONAL OR
MANDATORY REDEMPTION PRIOR TO MATURITY WITH OR WITHOUT A
PREMIUM; MAY BE IN FULLY REGISTERED FORM OR BEARER FORM
REGISTRABLE AS TO PRINCIPAL OR INTEREST OR BOTH; MAY BEAR SUCH
CONVERSION PRIVILEGES; MAY BE PAYABLE IN SUCH INSTALLMENTS AND AT
SUCH TIMES NOT EXCEEDING FORTY-FIVE YEARS FROM THE DATE OF
ISSUANCE; MAY BE PAYABLE AT SUCH PLACE OR PLACES WHETHER WITHIN
OR WITHOUT THE STATE; MAY BEAR INTEREST AT SUCH RATE OR RATES PER
ANNUM, WHICH MAY BE FIXED OR VARY ACCORDING TO INDEX, PROCEDURE,
OR FORMULA OR AS DETERMINED BY THE ENTERPRISE OR ITS AGENTS,
WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY INTEREST RATE LIMITATION APPEARING IN ANY
OTHER LAW OF THE STATE; MAY BE SUBJECT TO PURCHASE AT THE OPTION OF
THE HOLDER OR THE ENTERPRISE; MAY BE EVIDENCED IN SUCH MANNER;
MAY BE EXECUTED BY SUCH OFFICERS OF THE ENTERPRISE, INCLUDING THE
USE OF ONE OR MORE FACSIMILE SIGNATURES SO LONG AS AT LEAST ONE
MANUAL SIGNATURE APPEARS ON THE BONDS, WHICH MAY BE EITHER OF AN
OFFICER OF THE ENTERPRISE OR OF AN AGENT AUTHENTICATING THE SAME;
MAY BE IN THE FORM OF COUPON BONDS THAT HAVE ATTACHED INTEREST
COUPONS BEARING A MANUAL OR FACSIMILE SIGNATURE OF AN OFFICER OF
THE ENTERPRISE; AND MAY CONTAIN SUCH PROVISIONS NOT INCONSISTENT
WITH THIS PART 12, ALL AS PROVIDED IN THE RESOLUTION OF THE BOARD
UNDER WHICH THE BONDS ARE AUTHORIZED TO BE ISSUED OR AS PROVIDED
IN A TRUST INDENTURE BETWEEN THE ENTERPRISE AND ANY COMMERCIAL
BANK OR TRUST COMPANY HAVING FULL TRUST POWERS.
(c) BONDS OF THE ENTERPRISE MAY BE SOLD AT PUBLIC OR PRIVATE
SALE AT SUCH PRICE OR PRICES, IN SUCH MANNER, AND AT SUCH TIMES AS
DETERMINED BY THE BOARD, AND THE BOARD MAY PAY ALL FEES, EXPENSES,
AND COMMISSIONS THAT IT DEEMS NECESSARY OR ADVANTAGEOUS IN
CONNECTION WITH THE SALE OF THE BONDS. THE POWER TO FIX THE DATE OF
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-178

SALE OF THE BONDS, TO RECEIVE BIDS OR PROPOSALS, TO AWARD AND SELL
BONDS, TO FIX INTEREST RATES, AND TO TAKE ALL OTHER ACTION
NECESSARY TO SELL AND DELIVER THE BONDS MAY BE DELEGATED TO AN
OFFICER OR AGENT OF THE ENTERPRISE. ANY OUTSTANDING BONDS MAY BE
REFUNDED BY THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 56 OF TITLE 11. ALL
BONDS AND ANY INTEREST COUPONS APPLICABLE TO THE BONDS ARE
DECLARED TO BE NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENTS.
(d) THE RESOLUTION OR TRUST INDENTURE AUTHORIZING THE
ISSUANCE OF THE BONDS MAY PLEDGE ALL OR A PORTION OF THE FUND; MAY
PLEDGE ALL OR A PORTION OF THE RIGHTS OF THE ENTERPRISE TO IMPOSE,
AND RECEIVE THE REVENUES GENERATED BY, THE FEE AUTHORIZED BY
SECTION 10-16-1205 (1)(a)(I) AND ANY OTHER REVENUES GENERATED OR
RECEIVED BY THE ENTERPRISE, OTHER THAN ANY FEDERAL MONEY THE
ENTERPRISE MAY RECEIVE; MAY CONTAIN SUCH PROVISIONS FOR PROTECTING
AND ENFORCING THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF HOLDERS OF ANY OF THE
BONDS AS THE ENTERPRISE DEEMS APPROPRIATE; MAY SET FORTH THE
RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF THE HOLDERS OF ANY OF THE BONDS; AND MAY
CONTAIN PROVISIONS THAT THE ENTERPRISE DEEMS APPROPRIATE FOR THE
SECURITY OF THE HOLDERS OF THE BONDS, INCLUDING PROVISIONS FOR
LETTERS OF CREDIT, INSURANCE, STANDBY CREDIT AGREEMENTS, OR OTHER
FORMS OF CREDIT ENSURING TIMELY PAYMENT OF THE BONDS, INCLUDING
THE REDEMPTION PRICE OR THE PURCHASE PRICE.
(e) ANY PLEDGE OF THE FUND IS VALID AND BINDING FROM THE TIME
THE PLEDGE IS MADE. THE PLEDGED FUND IS IMMEDIATELY SUBJECT TO THE
LIEN OF THE PLEDGE WITHOUT ANY PHYSICAL DELIVERY OR FURTHER ACT,
AND THE LIEN OF THE PLEDGE IS VALID AND BINDING AGAINST ALL PARTIES
HAVING CLAIMS OF ANY KIND IN TORT, CONTRACT, OR OTHERWISE AGAINST
THE PLEDGING PARTY REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE CLAIMING PARTY HAS
NOTICE OF THE LIEN. THE INSTRUMENT BY WHICH THE PLEDGE IS CREATED
NEED NOT BE RECORDED OR FILED.
(f) NEITHER THE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD, NOR EMPLOYEES OF THE
ENTERPRISE, NOR ANY PERSON EXECUTING THE BONDS IS LIABLE
PERSONALLY ON THE BONDS OR SUBJECT TO ANY PERSONAL LIABILITY BY
REASON OF THE ISSUANCE OF THE BONDS.
(g) THE ENTERPRISE MAY PURCHASE ITS BONDS OUT OF ANY
AVAILABLE MONEY AND MAY HOLD, PLEDGE, CANCEL, OR RESELL SUCH
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-178

BONDS SUBJECT TO AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH AGREEMENTS WITH THE BOND
HOLDERS.
(2) THE ENTERPRISE MAY INVEST OR DEPOSIT ANY PROCEEDS AND
ANY INTEREST FROM THE SALE OF BONDS IN THE MANNER PROVIDED BY PART
6 OF ARTICLE 75 OF TITLE 24. IN ADDITION, AN ISSUING ENTERPRISE MAY
DIRECT A CORPORATE TRUSTEE THAT HOLDS THE BOND PROCEEDS AND ANY
INTEREST TO INVEST OR DEPOSIT THE PROCEEDS AND INTEREST IN
INVESTMENTS OR DEPOSITS OTHER THAN THOSE SPECIFIED BY SAID PART 6
IF THE BOARD DETERMINES, BY RESOLUTION, THAT THE INVESTMENT OR
DEPOSIT MEETS THE STANDARD ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 15-1-304, THE
INCOME IS AT LEAST COMPARABLE TO INCOME AVAILABLE ON INVESTMENTS
OR DEPOSITS SPECIFIED BY SAID PART 6, AND THE INVESTMENT WILL ASSIST
THE ENTERPRISE IN FUNDING PROGRAMS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART 12.
(3) ALL BANKS, TRUST COMPANIES, SAVINGS AND LOAN
ASSOCIATIONS, INSURANCE COMPANIES, EXECUTORS, ADMINISTRATORS,
GUARDIANS, TRUSTEES, AND OTHER FIDUCIARIES MAY LEGALLY INVEST ANY
MONEY WITHIN THEIR CONTROL IN ANY BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS PART 12.
PUBLIC ENTITIES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-75-601 (1), MAY INVEST PUBLIC
MONEY IN SUCH BONDS ONLY IF THE BONDS SATISFY THE INVESTMENT
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN PART 6 OF ARTICLE 75 OF TITLE 24.
(4) THE INCOME OR OTHER REVENUES OF THE ENTERPRISE, BONDS
ISSUED BY THE ENTERPRISE, AND THE TRANSFER OF AND THE INCOME FROM
ANY BONDS ISSUED BY THE ENTERPRISE ARE EXEMPT FROM ALL TAXATION
AND ASSESSMENTS IN THE STATE. IN THE RESOLUTION OR INDENTURE
AUTHORIZING THE BONDS, THE ENTERPRISE MAY WAIVE THE EXEMPTION
FROM FEDERAL INCOME TAXATION FOR INTEREST ON THE BONDS. BONDS
ISSUED BY THE ENTERPRISE ARE EXEMPT FROM THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE
51 OF TITLE 11.
10-16-1214. Report to joint budget committee - annual briefing.
(1) STARTING WITH THE FORECAST ISSUED IN SEPTEMBER OF 2026,
WITHIN TWO WEEKS AFTER THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF RELEASES THE
SEPTEMBER, MARCH, AND JUNE STATE REVENUE FORECASTS, THE
ENTERPRISE SHALL SUBMIT A WRITTEN REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REGARDING THE STATUS OF THE
FUND, INCLUDING:
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-178

(a) THE AMOUNT OF REVENUE GENERATED THROUGH FEES, FROM THE
ISSUANCE OF REVENUE BONDS PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1213, AND
FROM ANY OTHER SOURCES, THE AMOUNT OF FEDERAL PASS-THROUGH
FUNDING RECEIVED PURSUANT TO THE STATE INNOVATION WAIVER UNDER
SECTION 10-16-1109 AND SECTION 1332 OF THE FEDERAL ACT, 42 U.S.C.
SEC. 18052, AND ANY OTHER MONEY DEPOSITED IN OR TRANSFERRED TO THE
FUND DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING TWELVE MONTHS; AND
(b) THE AMOUNT OF REVENUE THE ENTERPRISE ANTICIPATES
GENERATING OR RECEIVING FROM ALL SOURCES IN THE NEXT TWELVE
MONTHS.
(2) (a) NO LATER THAN JANUARY 15, 2027, AND NO LATER THAN
JANUARY 15 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL PROVIDE
AN IN-PERSON BRIEFING TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE ON THE
ENTERPRISE, ITS REVENUES FROM ALL SOURCES, THE PROGRAMS IT FUNDS
AND THE AMOUNT ALLOCATED TO EACH PROGRAM, AND ANY OTHER
INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE.
(b) AS PART OF THE BRIEFING IN JANUARY, 2027, THE ENTERPRISE
SHALL ALSO PROVIDE TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE:
(I) AN ANALYSIS OF THE EFFECTS OF CHANGING THE STATEWIDE
AVERAGE PREMIUM REDUCTION IN THE REINSURANCE PROGRAM TO FIFTEEN
PERCENT, INCLUDING THE EFFECTS OF THAT CHANGE ON:
(A) TOTAL SAVINGS FOR THE ENTERPRISE;
(B) FEDERAL PASS-THROUGH FUNDING FROM THE STATE INNOVATION
WAIVER UNDER SECTION 10-16-1109 AND SECTION 1332 OF THE FEDERAL
ACT, 42 U.S.C. SEC. 18052;
(C) PREMIUMS IN THE NINE GEOGRAPHIC RATING AREAS IN THE
STATE; AND
(D) ENROLLMENT IN THE INDIVIDUAL MARKET; AND
(II) AN ANALYSIS OF THE EFFECTS OF CREATING A TIERED
STRUCTURE, BASED ON INCOME LEVELS, FOR PREMIUM ASSISTANCE FOR
INDIVIDUALS WHO PURCHASE INSURANCE ON THE EXCHANGE FOR THE
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-178

PREMIUM WRAP, INCLUDING THE EFFECTS OF THAT STRUCTURE ON:
(A) TOTAL SAVINGS FOR THE ENTERPRISE;
(B) FEDERAL PASS-THROUGH FUNDING FROM THE STATE INNOVATION
WAIVER UNDER SECTION 10-16-1109 AND SECTION 1332 OF THE FEDERAL
ACT, 42 U.S.C. SEC. 18052;
(C) PREMIUMS IN THE NINE GEOGRAPHIC RATING AREAS IN THE
STATE; AND
(D) ENROLLMENT IN THE INDIVIDUAL MARKET.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a), THE
REQUIREMENT IN THIS SECTION TO REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE CONTINUES INDEFINITELY.
10-16-1215. Rules.
EFFECTIVE FOR THE 2027 CALENDAR YEAR AND FOR EACH CALENDAR
YEAR THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSIONER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
BOARD, SHALL ADOPT RULES SPECIFYING THE PREMIUMS FOR
STATE-SUBSIDIZED INDIVIDUAL HEALTH COVERAGE PLANS PURCHASED BY
QUALIFIED INDIVIDUALS.
10-16-1216. Tax credit for contributions to the enterprise -
allocation notice - rules.
(1) (a) FOR THE TAX YEAR 2027 AND EACH TAX YEAR THEREAFTER,
A CREDIT AGAINST THE TAX IMPOSED BY SECTIONS 10-3-209 AND 10-6-128
IS ALLOWED TO ANY INSURANCE COMPANY THAT BECOMES A QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER BY MAKING A CONTRIBUTION TO THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION.
(b) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CLAIMING A CREDIT AGAINST PREMIUM
TAX LIABILITY UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT REQUIRED TO PAY ANY
ADDITIONAL RETALIATORY TAX AS A RESULT OF CLAIMING THE CREDIT.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT RULES NECESSARY FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOWED BY SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-178

SECTION.
(3) (a) FOR THE TAX YEAR 2027 AND EACH TAX YEAR THEREAFTER,
SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c) OF THIS SECTION, AN INSURANCE COMPANY
BECOMES A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER IF ALL OF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS
ARE MET:
(I) THE INSURANCE COMPANY DECLARES WITH ITS QUARTERLY TAX
PAYMENT DUE ON OR ABOUT JULY 31, IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE
COMMISSIONER, ITS INTENT TO CONTRIBUTE TO THE ENTERPRISE ON OR
BEFORE OCTOBER 31 AN AMOUNT OF MONEY EQUAL TO THE PREMIUM TAXES
PAID BY THE INSURANCE COMPANY PURSUANT TO THE JULY 31 TAX PAYMENT
OR A LESSER AMOUNT AS SPECIFIED BY THE COMMISSIONER IF REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDITS GRANTED BY THE
COMMISSIONER DOES NOT EXCEED NINE MILLION DOLLARS; AND
(III) THE INSURANCE COMPANY:
(A) RECEIVES AN ALLOCATION NOTICE FROM THE COMMISSIONER;
AND
(B) MAKES THE CONTRIBUTION TO THE ENTERPRISE AS SPECIFIED IN
THE ALLOCATION NOTICE ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 31.
(b) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c) OF THIS SECTION, AN INSURANCE
COMPANY THAT BECOMES A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM THE TAX
CREDIT ON ONE OR MORE SUBSEQUENT QUARTERLY OR ANNUAL TAX
PAYMENTS BEGINNING ON OR ABOUT OCTOBER 31.
(c) WHEN THE BOARD RECEIVES A CONTRIBUTION PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE COMMISSIONER OF THE
AMOUNT AND DATE OF THE CONTRIBUTION AND THE NAME OF THE
CONTRIBUTOR.
(4) (a) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c) OF THIS SECTION, BY
SEPTEMBER 30 OF EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) SEND AN ALLOCATION NOTICE TO EACH INSURANCE COMPANY
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-178

WHOSE DECLARATION OF INTENT TO CONTRIBUTE TO THE ENTERPRISE HAS
BEEN ACCEPTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4). THE ALLOCATION
NOTICE SHALL SPECIFY THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS ALLOCATED TO THE
INSURANCE COMPANY AND THE AMOUNT OF CASH THE INSURANCE COMPANY
MUST CONTRIBUTE TO THE EXCHANGE BY OCTOBER 31, WHICH AMOUNTS
SHALL BE IDENTICAL AND NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF PREMIUM TAXES
PAID BY THE INSURANCE COMPANY IN ITS QUARTERLY TAX PAYMENT DUE ON
OR ABOUT JULY 31.
(II) POST ON THE DIVISION'S WEBSITE WHETHER THE FULL AMOUNT
OF TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED TO BE ALLOCATED EACH YEAR HAS BEEN
ALLOCATED.
(b) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSIONER SHALL ALLOCATE NO MORE THAN A TOTAL OF NINE MILLION
DOLLARS OF PREMIUM TAX CREDITS PER YEAR.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4)(b)(III) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ALLOCATE TO AN INSURANCE COMPANY
THAT HAS DECLARED ITS INTENT TO CONTRIBUTE TO THE ENTERPRISE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TAX CREDITS IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE
AMOUNT OF PREMIUM TAXES PAID BY THE INSURANCE COMPANY IN ITS
QUARTERLY TAX PAYMENT DUE ON OR ABOUT JULY 31 IN THE ORDER IN
WHICH THE DIVISION RECEIVES SUCH QUARTERLY TAX PAYMENTS UNTIL THE
FULL AMOUNT OF CREDITS AVAILABLE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION HAS BEEN
ALLOCATED; EXCEPT THAT THE COMMISSIONER SHALL PRIORITIZE TAX
CREDIT ALLOCATIONS FIRST TO INSURANCE COMPANIES THAT HAVE
PURCHASED BONDS ISSUED BY THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO SECTION
10-16-1213.
(III) IF THE AMOUNT OF PREMIUM TAXES OR THE SUM OF ALL THE
PREMIUM TAXES FILED BY ALL THE INSURANCE COMPANIES ON ANY ONE DAY
WOULD EXCEED, SINGLY OR IN THE AGGREGATE, THE ANNUAL MAXIMUM
AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS AVAILABLE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSIONER SHALL REDUCE THE ALLOCATION TO THE INSURANCE
COMPANY WHOSE CONTRIBUTION FIRST EXCEEDS THE ANNUAL MAXIMUM
AGGREGATE TO THE AMOUNT NEEDED TO SATISFY THE ANNUAL MAXIMUM
AGGREGATE. IF THE COMMISSIONER IS UNABLE TO DETERMINE THE ORDER OF
RECEIPT OF TAX PAYMENTS ON THAT DAY, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL
ALLOCATE THE TAX CREDITS TO THE COMPANY OR AMONG THE COMPANIES
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-178

ON A PRO RATA BASIS BASED ON THE RATIO SUCH COMPANY'S QUARTERLY
TAX PAYMENT BEARS TO THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ALL SUCH COMPANIES'
QUARTERLY TAX PAYMENTS UNTIL THE FULL AMOUNT OF CREDITS
AVAILABLE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION HAS BEEN ALLOCATED.
(c) (I) FOR THE TAX YEAR 2027 AND EACH TAX YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ALLOW INSURANCE COMPANIES TO DECLARE
THEIR INTENT TO CONTRIBUTE TO THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION ON THE INSURANCE COMPANIES' QUARTERLY TAX PAYMENTS DUE
ON OR ABOUT OCTOBER 31 AND SHALL SEND SUCH COMPANIES ALLOCATION
NOTICES BY FEBRUARY 1 IF:
(A) THE FULL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS AVAILABLE IN ANY ONE
YEAR HAS NOT BEEN FULLY ALLOCATED BY THE COMMISSIONER PURSUANT
TO STATEMENTS OF INTENT FILED WITH INSURANCE COMPANIES' QUARTERLY
TAX PAYMENTS DUE ON OR ABOUT JULY 31; OR
(B) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS HAS BEEN CLAIMED, BUT
ONE OR MORE INSURANCE COMPANIES FAILED TO TIMELY MAKE A
CONTRIBUTION TO THE ENTERPRISE.
(II) AN INSURANCE COMPANY THAT DECLARES ITS INTENT TO
CONTRIBUTE TO THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4)(c)
SHALL MAKE THE CONTRIBUTION TO THE ENTERPRISE AS SPECIFIED IN THE
ALLOCATION NOTICE ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 AND MAY CLAIM THE TAX
CREDIT ON ONE OR MORE SUBSEQUENT QUARTERLY OR ANNUAL TAX
PAYMENTS DUE ON OR ABOUT MARCH 1.
(5) THE BOARD SHALL USE MONEY CONTRIBUTED TO THE ENTERPRISE
AS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART 12.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-22-110, amend
(1)(a), (3)(a), (4)(b), (4)(c)(I) introductory portion, (4)(c)(II), and (5); and
add (6) as follows:
10-22-110. Tax credit for contributions to the exchange or
enterprise - allocation notice - rules - repeal.
(1) (a) For the tax year 2013 and each tax year thereafter THROUGH
THE TAX YEAR 2026, a credit against the tax imposed by sections 10-3-209
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-178

and 10-6-128 is allowed to any insurance company that becomes a qualified
taxpayer by making a contribution to the exchange pursuant to this section.
(3) (a) FOR EACH TAX YEAR THROUGH THE TAX YEAR 2026, subject
to subsection (4)(c) of this section, an insurance company shall become a
qualified taxpayer if all of the following conditions are met:
(I) The insurance company declares with its quarterly tax payment
due on or about July 31 in the manner prescribed by the commissioner its
intent to contribute to the exchange on or before October 31 an amount of
money equal to the premium taxes paid by the company pursuant to the July
31 tax payment or a lesser amount as specified by the commissioner if
required pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (4) SUBSECTION (4)(b) of
this section;
(II) The total amount of the tax credits granted by the commissioner
does not exceed five million dollars; except that, on and after September 1,
2022, through August 31, 2028 AUGUST 31, 2027, the total amount of the
tax credits does not exceed nine million dollars; and
(III) The insurance company receives an allocation notice from the
commissioner and the insurance company makes the contribution to the
exchange as specified in the allocation notice on or before October 31.
(4) (b) (I) Subject to subsection (4)(c) of this section, the
commissioner shall allocate no more than the following total amounts of
premium tax credits per year:
(A) Before September 1, 2022, a total of five million dollars; AND
(B) On and after September 1, 2022, through August 31, 2028
AUGUST 31, 2027, a total of nine million dollars. and
(C) On and after September 1, 2028, a total of five million dollars.
(II) FOR EACH TAX YEAR THROUGH THE TAX YEAR 2026, except as
provided in subsection (4)(b)(III) of this section, the commissioner shall
allocate to an insurance company that has declared its intent to contribute
to the exchange pursuant to this section tax credits in an amount equal to the
amount of premium taxes paid by the insurance company in its quarterly tax
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-178

payment due on or about July 31 in the order in which the division receives
such quarterly tax payments until the full amount of credits available
pursuant to this section has been allocated.
(c) (I) FOR EACH TAX YEAR THROUGH THE TAX YEAR 2026, the
commissioner shall allow insurance companies to declare their intent to
contribute to the exchange pursuant to this section on the insurance
companies' quarterly tax payments due on or about October 31 and shall
send such companies allocation notices by February 1 if:
(II) An insurance company that declares its intent to contribute to
the exchange pursuant to this paragraph (c) SUBSECTION (4)(c) shall make
the contribution to the exchange as specified in the allocation notice on or
before March 1 and may claim the tax credit on one or more subsequent
quarterly or annual tax payments due on or about March 1.
(5) The board shall use money contributed to the exchange as
follows:
(a) The amount of contributions from insurers to which the first five
million dollars of tax credits is allocated pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of
this section and the interest derived from the deposit and investment of the
money, to operate and sustain the exchange and to build reserves. except
that, on and after September 1, 2028, the total amount of contributions and
interest derived from the deposit and investment of the money shall be used
for the purposes specified in this subsection (5)(a).
(b) (I) Any amount of contributions from insurers to which any
amount in excess of the first five million dollars of tax credits is allocated
pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section and the interest derived from
the deposit and investment of the money, for the public awareness and
education campaign in section 10-22-115.
(II) This subsection (5)(b) is repealed, effective December 31, 2028.
(6) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2027.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-501, add (4.1)
as follows:
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-178

39-28.8-501. Marijuana tax cash fund - creation - distribution
- legislative declaration - repeal.
(4.1) (a) BY JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
FORTY MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE
AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 10-16-1206 (1).
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4.1) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 10. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 1 of
chapter 476, (SB25-206), amend (2)(c), (2)(h) introductory portion, and
(2)(h)(I) as follows:
Section 1. Definitions - general provisions. As used in this act, the
following definitions and general provisions shall apply:
(2) The funds designated to constitute the state emergency reserve
for the 2025-26 fiscal year are:
(c) The marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 (1),
C.R.S., up to a maximum of $100,000,000 $60,000,000;
(h) Up to $39,775,000 $79,775,000 of state properties as follows:
(I) The capitol annex building located at 1375 Sherman Street,
Denver, Colorado, 80203, which has a value of $28,225,000 $68,225,000;
and
SECTION 11. Amend as added by Section 1 of House Bill
26-1410, (2)(c), (2)(h) introductory portion, and (2)(h)(I) as follows:
Section 1. Definitions - general provisions. As used in this act, the
following definitions and general provisions shall apply:
(2) The funds designated to constitute the state emergency reserve
for the 2026-27 fiscal year are:
(c) The marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 (1),
C.R.S., up to a maximum of $100,000,000 $60,000,000;
PAGE 18-SENATE BILL 26-178

(h) Up to $53,337,711 $93,337,711 of state properties as follows:
(I) The capitol annex building located at 1375 Sherman Street,
Denver, Colorado, 80203, which has a value of $37,237,711 $77,237,711;
and
SECTION 12. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 19-SENATE BILL 26-178

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 20-SENATE BILL 26-178